Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2644.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6886HV (1) 91 as/js H.F. 2644 Section 1. Section 692A.124, Code 2026, is amended to read 1 as follows: 2 692A.124 Electronic monitoring. 3 1. A Except as provided in subsection 4, a sex offender who 4 is placed on probation, parole, work release, special sentence, 5 or any other type of conditional release, may be supervised by 6 an electronic tracking and monitoring system in addition to any 7 other conditions of supervision. 8 2. The Except as provided in subsection 4, the determination 9 to use electronic tracking and monitoring to supervise a sex 10 offender shall be based upon a validated risk assessment 11 approved by the department of corrections, and also upon the 12 sex offenderâs criminal history, progress in treatment and 13 supervision, and other relevant factors. 14 3. If Except as provided in subsection 4, if a sex 15 offender is under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, 16 the determination to use electronic tracking and monitoring 17 to supervise the sex offender shall be based upon a risk 18 assessment performed by a juvenile court officer. 19 4. A sex offender subject to the registration requirements 20 under section 692A.104, and verification of relevant 21 information requirements under section 692A.108, who is unable 22 to provide verification of the sex offenderâs residence shall 23 be supervised by an electronic tracking and monitoring system 24 in addition to any other conditions of supervision. 25